Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-608] Termination of self-insurer
status and withdrawal of security deposit. (a) A person who terminates
the person's status as a self-insurer or whose certificate of self-insurance
has been revoked and who obtains a motor vehicle insurance policy for any
formerly self-insured motor vehicle or shows that the person does not own any
motor vehicle, may apply to the commissioner for the return of the person's
security deposit or cancellation of the surety bond.

(b) After a lapse of twenty-four months from
termination or revocation of self-insurer status and proof satisfactory to the
commissioner that all claims have been fully adjudicated and paid, that all
allotments and assessments have been paid, and that the owner has complied with
the applicable provisions of this article, rules, orders, and directives of the
commissioner, and provisions of the self-insurer's agreement, the commissioner
may release the securities deposited or permit the cancellation of the bond. [L
2000, c 24, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next